Minnesota, session 2025-2026, SF3187.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. new text begin APPROPRIATIONS; MINNESOTA YOUTH POET LAUREATE.new text end new text begin $100,000 in fiscal year 2026 and $100,000 in fiscal year 2027 are appropriated from the arts and cultural heritage fund to the director of the Minnesota Humanities Center for a grant to a nonprofit to operate a statewide youth poet laureate program in coordination with the Minnesota Humanities Center. The program should award a young person who is 13 to 19 years of age, through a competitive process similar to the National Youth Poet Laureate program, to be the Minnesota Youth Poet Laureate and also provide opportunities to celebrate and highlight the work of the state Youth Poet Laureate and young writers in Minnesota. new text end